Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 2
Succession of Quasi-Community Property — Elective Share of Surviving Spouse

§ 15-2-201. Quasi-community property.

Upon death of a married person domiciled in this state, one-half (½) of the quasi-community property shall belong to the surviving spouse and the other one-half (½) of such property shall be subject to the testamentary disposition of the decedent and, if not devised by the decedent, goes to the surviving spouse.

Quasi-community property is all personal property, wherever situated, and all real property situated in this state which has heretofore been acquired or is hereafter acquired by the decedent while domiciled elsewhere and which would have been the community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse had the decedent been domiciled in this state at the time of its acquisition plus all personal property, wherever situated, and all real property situated in this state, which has heretofore been acquired or is hereafter acquired in exchange for real or personal property, wherever situated, which would have been the community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse if the decedent had been domiciled in this state at the time the property so exchanged was acquired, provided that real property does not and personal property does include leasehold interests in real property, provided that quasi-community property shall include real property situated in another state and owned by a domiciliary of this state if the laws of such state permit descent and distribution of such property to be governed by the laws of this state.

All quasi-community property is subject to the debts of decedent.

§ 15-2-202. Augmented estate.

Whenever a married person domiciled in the state has made a transfer of quasi-community property to a person other than the surviving spouse without adequate consideration and without the consent of the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse may require the transferee to restore to the decedent’s estate such property, if the transferee retains such property and, if not, its proceeds or, if none, its value at the time of transfer, if:

The decedent retained, at the time of his death, the possession or enjoyment of or the right to income from the property; or

The decedent retained, at the time of his death, a power, either alone or in conjunction with any other person, to revoke or to consume, invade or dispose of the principal for his own benefit; or

The decedent held the property at the time of his death with another with the right of survivorship; or

The decedent had transferred such property within two (2) years of his death to the extent that the aggregate transfers to any one (1) donee in either of the years exceeded ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or the amount of the annual exclusion for the federal gift tax set forth at 26 U.S.C. section 2503, whichever is greater.

§ 15-2-203. Elective right to quasi-community property and augmented estate.

The right of the surviving spouse in the augmented quasi-community property estate shall be elective and shall be limited to one-half (½) of the total augmented quasi-community property estate which will include, as a part of the property described in sections 15-2-201 and 15-2-202, Idaho Code, property received from the decedent and owned by the surviving spouse at the decedent’s death, plus the value of such property transferred by the surviving spouse at any time during marriage to any person other than the decedent which would have been in the surviving spouse’s quasi-community property augmented estate if that spouse had predeceased the decedent to the extent that the owner’s transferred property is derived from the decedent by any means other than testate or intestate succession without a full consideration in money or money’s worth. This shall not include any benefits derived from the federal social security system by reason of service performed or disability incurred by the decedent and shall include property transferred from the decedent to the surviving spouse by virtue of joint ownership and through the exercise of a power of appointment also exercisable in favor of others than the surviving spouse and appointed to the surviving spouse.

The elective share to the quasi-community estate thus computed shall be reduced by an allocable portion of general administration expenses, homestead allowance, exempt property and enforceable claims.

Property owned by the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent’s death and property transferred by the surviving spouse is presumed to have been derived from the decedent except to the extent that the surviving spouse establishes that it was derived from another source.

§ 15-2-204. Right of election personal.

The right of election of the surviving spouse may be exercised only during his lifetime by him. In the case of a protected person, the right of election may be exercised only by order of the court in which protective proceedings as to his property are pending, after finding that exercise is necessary to provide adequate support for the protected person during his probable life expectancy.

§ 15-2-205. Proceeding for elective share — Time limit.

The surviving spouse may elect to take his elective share in the augmented net estate by filing in the court and mailing or delivering to the personal representative a petition for the elective share within nine (9) months after the death of the decedent or six (6) months after the date of filing of the petition for probate, whichever is later. The court may extend the time for election as it sees fit for cause shown by the surviving spouse before the time for election has expired.

The surviving spouse shall give notice of the time and place set for hearing to persons interested in the estate and to the distributees and recipients of portions of the augmented net estate whose interests will be adversely affected by the taking of the elective share.

The surviving spouse may withdraw his demand for an elective share at any time before entry of a final determination by the court.

After notice and hearing, the court shall determine the amount of the elective share and shall order its payment from the assets of the augmented net estate or by contribution as appears appropriate under section 15-2-207[, Idaho Code,] of this code. If it appears that a fund or property included in the augmented net estate has not come into the possession of the personal representative, or has been distributed by the personal representative, the court nevertheless shall fix the liability of any person who has any interest in the fund or property or who has possession thereof, whether as trustee or otherwise. The proceeding may be maintained against fewer than all persons against whom relief could be sought, but no person is subject to contribution in any greater amount than he would have been if relief had been secured against all persons subject to contribution.

The order or judgment of the court may be enforced as necessary in suit for contribution or payment in other courts of this state or other jurisdictions.

§ 15-2-206. Effect of election on benefits by will or statute.

The surviving spouse’s election of his elective share does not affect the share of the surviving spouse under the provisions of the decedent’s will or intestate succession unless the surviving spouse also expressly renounces in the petition for an elective share the benefit of all or any of the provisions. If any provision is so renounced, the property or other benefit which would otherwise have passed to the surviving spouse thereunder is treated, subject to contribution under section 15-2-207(b), Idaho Code, as if the surviving spouse had predeceased the testator.

A surviving spouse is entitled to homestead allowance and exempt property whether or not he elects to take an elective share and whether or not he renounces the benefits conferred upon him by the will except that, if it clearly appears from the will that a provision therein made for the surviving spouse was intended to be in lieu of these rights, he is not so entitled if he does not renounce the provision so made for him in the will.

§ 15-2-207. Liability of others.

In a proceeding for an elective share, property which passes or has passed to the surviving spouse by testate or intestate succession and property included in the augmented estate which has not been renounced is applied first to satisfy the elective share and to reduce the amount due from other recipients of portions of the augmented estate.

The remaining amount of the elective share is equitably apportioned among beneficiaries of the will and transferees of the augmented estate in proportion to the value of their interest therein.

Only original transferees from, or appointees of, the decedent and their donees, to the extent the donees have the property or its proceeds, are subject to the contribution to make up the elective share of the surviving spouse. A person liable to contribution may choose to give up the property transferred to him or to pay its value as of the time it is considered in computing the augmented estate.

§ 15-2-208. Waiver.

The right of election of a surviving spouse and the rights of the surviving spouse to homestead allowance and exempt property, or either of them, may be waived, wholly or partially, before or after marriage, by a written contract, agreement or waiver signed by the party waiving after fair disclosure. Unless it provides to the contrary, a waiver of “all rights” (or equivalent language) in the property or estate of a present or prospective spouse or a complete property settlement entered into after or in anticipation of separation or divorce is a waiver of all rights to elective share, homestead allowance and exempt property by each spouse in the property of the other and a renunciation by each of all benefits which would otherwise pass to him from the other by intestate succession or by virtue of the provisions of any will executed before the waiver or property settlement.

§ 15-2-209. Election of nondomiciliary.

Upon the death of any married person not domiciled in this state who dies leaving a valid will disposing of real property in this state which is not the community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse has the same right to elect to take a portion of or interest in such property against the will of the decedent as though the property was situated in the decedent’s domicile at death.